Massachusetts, session 194th, S3137.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Schrafft
Center LLC as the owner of record of a certain parcel of land located at 425 Medford Street in
the Charlestown section of the city of Boston may move a 30,943 square foot, more or less,
portion of said parcel of land from its current location within the designated port area to an area
on the same parcel which shall be included within the boundaries of that designated port area.
(b) The proposed land swap described in subsection (a) is shown on plan of land entitled
“Exhibit Plan of Land-Maritime Area”, dated January 23, 2014, identifying the proposed “DPA
Relocation” area. The plan of land shall be recorded at the time of the land swap.
(c) The parcel of land at 425 Medford Street is identified as parcel number 0201799000
on the city of Boston assessor’s maps and contains approximately 839,808 square feet and
48,965 square feet of land and water, respectively, and are described in deed filed with the
of 2

Suffolk county registry district of the land court as document 747466, certificate of title number
125179, recorded in book 621, page 179.
of 2